New York, session 2025-2026, A4302.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.33 to read as follows: 3 § 13.33 Free use of pavilions. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 4 other law, any recognized veterans' organization shall be permitted to 5 rent any pavilion at state parks, other state recreational facilities 6 and historic sites under the jurisdiction of the office or any other 7 state agency, upon the same terms and conditions as apply to the general 8 public, but without the payment of any fees or other charges for the use 9 of such pavilion. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05968-01-5